South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4759.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 55, Title 46 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 46-55-5. The purpose of this chapter is to regulate the sale and distribution of consumable hemp products. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the manufacture, sale, and distribution of consumable hemp products is strictly prohibited unless specifically provided for in this chapter and Chapter 14, Title 61. In acknowledging consumable hemp products may be intoxicating, the regulation and control of such products in this State is in the interest of public health and safety through ensuring proper age verification and the state's ability to efficiently enforce the requirements and restrictions contained in this chapter. SECTION 2.  Section 46-55-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 46-55-10.  For the purposes of this chapter: (1) "Cannabidiol" or "CBD" means the compound by the same name derived from the hemp variety of the Cannabis sativa L. plant. (2) "Cannabinoids" means any tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) derived from hemp except CBD, CBG, CBC, or other non-intoxicating hemp products that cause a psychoactive reaction. (2)(3) "Commercial sales" means the sale of hemp products in the stream of commerce, at retail, wholesale, and online. (3)(4) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the South Carolina Department of Agriculture. (5) "Consumable hemp product" means a finished hemp product that is intended for human consumption, ingestion, inhalation, or absorption and contains any part of the hemp plant, including intoxicating hemp products, cannabinoids, or any compound, concentrate, derivative, including synthetic derivatives, extract, isolate, or resin derived from hemp other than CBD, CBG, CBC, or CBN provided the products do not contain an intoxicating hemp product that cause a psychoactive reaction. (4)(6) "Cultivating" means planting, watering, growing, and harvesting a plant or crop. (5)(7) "Department" means the South Carolina Department of Agriculture. (6)(8) "Federally defined THC level for hemp" means a delta-9 THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis, or the THC concentration for hemp defined in 7 U.S.C. SECTION 5940, whichever is greater. (7)(9) "Handling" means possessing or storing hemp for any period of time. "Handling" also includes possessing or storing hemp in a vehicle for any period of time other than during its actual transport from the premises of a licensed person to cultivate or process industrial hemp to the premises of another licensed person. "Handling" does not mean possessing or storing finished hemp products. (8)(10) "Hemp" or "industrial hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the nonsterilized seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with the federally defined THC level for hemp a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (.3%) on a dry weight basis. Hemp shall be considered an agricultural commodity. (9)(11) "Hemp products" means all products with the federally defined THC level for hemp  a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (.3%) on a dry weight basis derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or hemp plant parts, that are prepared in a form available for commercial sale, including, but not limited to, cosmetics, personal care products, food intended for animal or human consumption, cloth, cordage, fiber, fuel, paint, paper, particleboard, plastics, and any product containing one or more hemp-derived cannabinoids, such as cannabidiol. Unprocessed or raw plant material, including nonsterilized hemp seeds, is not considered a hemp product. (12) "Intoxicating hemp product" means a product comprised of derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, esters, ethers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation including, but not limited to: (i) delta-10 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (ii) delta-9 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (iii) delta-8 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (iv) delta-7 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (v) delta-6a, 10a cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (vi) exo-tetrahydrocannabinol; (vii) metabolites of tetrahydrocannabinol, including 11-hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol, 3-27 hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol, and 7-12 hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol; (viii) tetrahydrocannabinolic acid; (ix) hydrogenated forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including hexahydrocannabinol, hexahydrocannabiphrol, and hexahydrocannabihexol; (x) synthetic forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including dronabinol; (xi) ester forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, delta-6a, 10a tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, and hexahydrocannabinol-O-6 acetate; (xii) ether forms of tetrahydrocannabinol and hexahydrocannabinol, including delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol methyl ether and delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol methyl ether; (xiii) tetrahydrocannabivarins, including delta-8 tetrahydrocannabivarin, but excluding delta-9 tetrahydrocannabivarin; (xiv) analogues or tetrahydrocannabinols with an alkyl chain of four or more carbon atoms, including tetrahydrocannabiphorols, tetrahydrocannabioctyls, tetrahydocannabihexols, or tetrahydrocannabutols; (xv) delta-8 isotetrahydrocannabinol, delta-4 isotetrahydrocannabinol and isohexahydrocannabinol; (xvi) any combination of the compounds, including hexahydrocannabiphorol-o-ester and delta-8 tetrahydrocannabiphorol acetate, delta-9 tetrahydorcannabiphorol acetate; or (xvii) any other substance that contains THC that, when ingested, inhaled, or absorbed into the body, produces an intoxicating or psychoactive reaction. (10)(13) "Licensee" means an individual or business entity possessing a license issued by the department under the authority of this chapter to cultivate, handle, or process hemp. (11)(14) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as in Section 44-53-110 and does not include tetrahydrocannabinol in hemp or hemp products as defined herein. (12)(15) "Processing" means converting an agricultural commodity into a marketable form. (16) "SLED" means the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. (17) "Psychoactive reaction" means an altered state of the brain that has significant effects on a person's psychological processes, consciousness, thinking, physical ability, perception, or emotion. (13)(18) "State plan" means the plan submitted by the department and approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to which the department regulates hemp production. (14)(19) "THC" means tetrahydrocannabinol. SECTION 3.  Chapter 55, Title 46 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 46-55-70.  (A) Any consumable hemp product possessed, distributed, sold, or offered for sale to consumers in this State in violation of this chapter is considered contraband and may be seized by law enforcement as provided for by law. (B) The sale or possession of a consumable hemp product, other than hemp beverages governed by Chapter 14, Title 61, is prohibited by law and punishable in the same manner as THC pursuant to Sections 44-53-190 and 44-53-370. (C) Online sales, direct deliveries, and direct shipments of consumable hemp products, within or into this State are strictly prohibited. For purposes of this section, "direct shipment" means the shipment of any consumable hemp product from any producer or retailer of consumable hemp products directly to a resident of this State. A person who is convicted of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined up to three thousand dollars or up to three years in jail, or both. (D) SLED is vested with the enforcement of this section. Section 46-55-80. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the continuous transportation through South Carolina of the plant Cannabis sativa L., and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis, produced in accordance with 7 U.S.C Section 1639o et. seq. SECTION 4.  Title 61 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 14 Intoxicating Hemp Beverages Article 1 Definitions Section 61-14-20.  As used in this chapter: (1) "Batch" means a specific quantity of a specific product containing cannabinoids which are manufactured at the same time and use the same methods, equipment, and ingredients that are uniform and intended to meet specifications for identity, strength, purity, and composition and is manufactured, packaged, and labeled according to a single-batch production record executed and documented. (2) "Cannabinoids" means any tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) derived from hemp except CBD, CBG, CBC, or other non-intoxicating hemp products. (3) "Certificate of Analysis" means a document issued by an independent testing laboratory which provides information about the chemical composition of a particular batch of a consumable hemp product. (4) "Department" means the South Carolina Department of Revenue. (5) "Hemp" means the plant cannabis sativa L, and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis. (6) "Hemp beverage" is an intoxicating, alcoholic beverage subject to the exercise of the police power of the General Assembly pursuant to Section 1, Article VIII-A of the South Carolina Constitution. "Hemp beverages" may not contain more than five milligrams, per serving, of hemp-derived tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) with concentrations of delta-9 THC of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis and must be sold in twelve-ounce cans or bottles. A beverage containing any other intoxicating hemp product as defined in Section 46-55-10, whether combined with delta-9 THC or not, is strictly prohibited by law. (7) "Manufacture" means to compound, blend, extract, infuse, cook, or otherwise make or prepare hemp beverages, including the processes of extraction, infusion, packaging, repackaging, labeling, and relabeling of hemp beverages. (8) "Producer" means a manufacturer, bottler, or importer of hemp beverages into the United States. (9) "Proof of age" means a valid driver's license or other government-issued identification card that contains a photograph of the person and confirms the person's age as twenty-one years of age or older. (10) "Retailer" means a person or entity that sells hemp beverages for consumption and not for resale. (11) "Retail establishment" means a place of business open to the general public for the sale of goods or services. (12) "Serving" means a hemp beverage containing twelve fluid ounces. (13) "SLED" means the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. (14) "THC" means tetrahydrocannabinol. (15) "Wholesaler" means a person who purchases, acquires, or imports from outside this State or who purchases or acquires from a manufacturer or producer in the State hemp beverages for resale. Article 3 Enforcement Section 61-14-300. (A) The functions, duties, and powers set forth in this chapter are vested in the department and SLED. The department must administer the provisions of this chapter, and SLED must enforce the provisions of this chapter. (B) All hemp beverages distributed into or within the State and offered for sale and sold to consumers in this State must be governed by this chapter. (C) Any hemp beverage possessed, distributed, sold, or offered for sale to consumers in this State in violation of this article must be considered contraband and may be seized by law enforcement as provided for by law. (D) The department shall administer the provisions of this article related to the licensing and taxation of hemp beverages. (E) SLED is vested with the enforcement of this article. (F) The department and SLED are authorized to promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon them by law for the proper administration and enforcement of, and consistent with, this article including, but not limited to: (1) regulations for the application and issuance of hemp beverage licenses; (2) regulations to prevent the unlawful manufacture, bottling, sale, distribution, transportation, and importation of hemp beverages; (3) regulations necessary to effect an equitable distribution of hemp beverages in this State; (4) regulations for the analysis of hemp beverages sold in this State and for a procedure for obtaining the samples for this purpose; (5) regulations governing the administration and enforcement of provisions relating to producers and wholesalers of hemp beverages; and (6) regulations for application for and issuance of hemp beverage licenses and the sale, distribution, promotion, and shipment of hemp beverages into and within the State. Section 61-14-310. SLED has the exclusive authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter in a manner that may reasonably be expected, and shall conduct random, unannounced inspections at locations where such products are sold or distributed to ensure compliance with this chapter. Section 61-14-320. (A) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly sell or distribute hemp beverages to a person who is under twenty-one years of age or to purchase hemp beverages on behalf of a person who is under twenty-one years of age. (B) A person who violates this section must be punished in accordance with Chapter 6, Title 61 related to sales of liquor to underage persons including, but not limited to, Sections 61-6-4070, 61-6-4075, 61-6-4080, and 61-6-4090. (C)(1) It is unlawful for a person under the age of twenty-one to purchase, attempt to purchase, consume, or knowingly possess consumable hemp beverages. Possession is prima facie evidence that it was knowingly possessed. It is also unlawful for a person to falsely represent his age for the purpose of procuring consumable hemp beverages. (2) A person who violates the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than two hundred dollars or must be imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or both. (D) The sale or possession of a hemp beverage containing more than five milligrams of hemp derived delta-9 THC per twelve ounces or any beverage containing any other intoxicating hemp products, whether combined with delta-9 THC or not, is prohibited by law and punishable in the same manner as THC pursuant to Sections 44-53-190 and 44-53-370. (E) A person who is charged with a violation of this section may avail themselves of any affirmative defenses, diversion programs, conditional discharge provisions, intervention programs, or similar alternatives to conviction and sentencing that are provided by law and would be available to a person charged with a similar violation involving alcoholic liquor. Section 61-14-330. (A) A person engaged in the business of selling retail hemp beverages must post, in each location that he has obtained a license, a sign with the following words printed: "The possession of hemp-derived beverages by a person under twenty-one years of age is a criminal offense under the laws of this State, and it also is unlawful for a person to knowingly give false information concerning his age for the purpose of hemp beverages." The department shall prescribe by regulation the size of the lettering and the location of the sign on the seller's premises. (B) A retail seller of hemp beverages who fails to display the sign required by this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than one hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than thirty days. Section 61-14-340. (A) This article does not permit a person to: (1) undertake any task under the influence of hemp beverages when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice; or (2) operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any other vehicle while under the influence of a hemp beverage. (B) This article does not exempt a person from prosecution for a criminal offense related to impairment or intoxication resulting from use of hemp beverages or relieve a person from any requirement under law to submit to a breath, blood, urine, or other test to detect the presence of a controlled substance. Section 61-14-350. It is unlawful for a person to have in his possession, except in the trunk or luggage compartment, a consumable hemp product in an open container in a motor vehicle of any kind while located upon the public highways or highway rights of way of this State. This section must not be construed to prohibit the transporting of consumable hemp products in a closed container, and this section does not apply to vehicles parked in legal parking places during functions such as sporting events where law enforcement officers are on duty to perform traffic control duties. A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than one hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than thirty days. Section 61-14-360. It is unlawful to sell consumable hemp products on Sunday except as authorized by law, on Christmas Day, or during periods proclaimed by the Governor in the interest of law and order or public morals and decorum. Full authority to proclaim these periods is conferred upon the Governor in addition to all his other powers. A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be punished as follows: (1) for a first offense, by a fine of two hundred dollars or imprisonment for sixty days; (2) for a second offense, by a fine of one thousand dollars or imprisonment for one year; and (3) for a third or subsequent offense, by a fine of two thousand dollars or imprisonment for two years. Article 5 Product Requirements Section 61-14-500. (A) A hemp beverage may not be distributed into or within the State or offered for sale or sold at retail within the State, unless the product: (1) has a corresponding certificate of analysis described in Section 61-14-520 issued by an independent testing laboratory that tests the batch from which the product was produced; (2) is in the original sealed container as packaged by the producer and meets the packaging restrictions in Section 61-14-530; (3) meets the serving size and product content requirements, including total THC, described in Sections 61-14-20 and 61-14-320; and (4) meets the labeling requirements described in Section 61-40-540. (B) Every distributor and retailer shall maintain and make immediately available for inspection to any law enforcement officer or authorized agent of the board a copy of the certificate of analysis of each consumable hemp product being distributed by a distributor or offered for sale by a retailer. (C) Any person, including any servant, agent, or employee of the person who distributes, sells, or offers for sale any hemp beverage in violation of this section is subject to the following penalties: (1) for a first offense within a three-year period, a fine of one thousand dollars; (2) for a second offense within a three-year period, a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars; and (3) for a third or subsequent offense within a three-year period, a fine of five thousand dollars. Section 61-14-510. In order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this State from dangerous foreign products, an independent testing laboratory must meet all of the following requirements: (1) is accredited by a third-party accrediting body as a competent testing laboratory pursuant to International Organization for Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission (ISO/IEC) 17025:2017 of the International Organization for Standardization; (2) does not have a direct or indirect interest in the producer whose product is being tested; and (3) does not have a direct or indirect interest in a facility that cultivates, processes, distributes, or sells hemp or consumable hemp products in this State or in another jurisdiction. Section 61-14-520. (A) The protocols for testing a hemp beverage by an independent testing laboratory must include the following, as well as a determination of corresponding tolerance limits: (1) cannabinoid content and potency including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) total THC (THC+THCA); (b) total CBD (CBD+CBDA); (c) THC/CBD ratio, if applicable; and (d) percent of THC relative to original plant material (w/w); (2) terpene profiles; (3) heavy metals; (4) chemical contamination, such as residual solvents remaining after extraction and concentration; (5) microbials, including pathogenic microbials; (6) mycotoxins; and (7) residual insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, and growth regulators used during cultivation. (B) The certificate of analysis must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (1) the batch number or lot number of the product; (2) the date the certificate of analysis is issued; (3) the method of analysis for each test conducted; (4) the product name; (5) a scannable barcode or quick response code linked to the label on the consumable hemp product container; (6) the cannabinoid profile by the percentage in dry weight of CBD and total THC content and verification that the product contains an amount of total THC not exceeding that which is stated on the label of the product; and (7) a listing of all ingredients for each product, including, if present, solvents, pesticides, microbial contaminants, and heavy metals. Section 61-14-530. Packaging of consumable hemp products: (1) may not bear the likeness or contain cartoon-like characteristics of a real or fictional person, animal, or fruit that appeals to children; (2) may not be modeled after a brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to children; (3) may not include a statement, artwork, or design that could reasonably mislead an individual to believe that the package contains anything other than a consumable hemp product; and (4) must be child-resistant. Section 61-14-540. Each container of a hemp beverage must be labeled to include, at a minimum: (1) a list of all ingredients in descending order of predominance; (2) a scannable barcode or quick response code linked to the certificate of analysis; (3) the manufacture date and expiration date; (4) the batch number must correspond to the certificate of analysis; (5) the total number of milligrams of THCs found in the container; (6) the serving size; (7) the total number of milligrams of THCs per serving; and (8) the following warnings: (a) to keep the product out of reach of children; (b) that consumption of the product may cause the person to fail a drug test due to THC being present; (c) that the product is not safe nor intended for any person under twenty-one years of age; (d) must contain the words "CANNABIS USE WHILE PREGNANT OR BREASTFEEDING MAY BE HARMFUL. CONSUMPTION OF CERTAIN CANNABINOIDS IMPAIRS YOUR ABILITY TO DRIVE AND OPERATE HEAVY MACHINERY. PLEASE USE EXTREME CAUTION."; and (e) a statement that the hemp beverages are not approved for any medical use by the United States Food and Drug Administration. Article 7 Licensing; Relationship between Manufacturers, Wholesalers, and Retailers; Taxation Section 61-14-700. (A) A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer of hemp beverages must be in possession of a valid applicable hemp beverage license issued by the department that has sole and exclusive power to issue hemp beverage licenses. (B) The department may issue, subject to revocation, the following licenses: (1) hemp beverage manufacturers' licenses which authorize the licensees to manufacture hemp beverages and to sell, deliver, or ship hemp beverages, in accordance with regulations, in bottles, cans, or in similar closed containers to a person in this State who has a wholesaler's license issued pursuant to this article, and in barrels, bottles, cans, or other closed containers to persons outside this State. However, deliveries or shipments may not be made into another state whose laws prohibit the consignee from receiving or selling hemp beverages; (2) hemp beverage wholesalers' licenses which authorize the licensees to purchase, store, keep, possess, import into this State, transport, sell, and deliver hemp beverages in bottles or similar closed containers, in accordance with regulations, to a person having a manufacturer's or retail dealer's license issued pursuant to this article; and (3) hemp beverage retail dealers' licenses which authorize the licensees to purchase hemp beverage from wholesalers having licenses issued pursuant to this article, and to store, keep, possess, and sell alcoholic liquors at retail. A hemp beverage retail dealer's license may only be issued to a retailer who is in possession of a valid retail liquor store license. (C) The department is authorized to issue, suspend, revoke, renew, or decline to renew hemp beverage licenses pursuant to Article 3, Chapter 6, Title 61; Sections 61-2-90 through 140; and Section 61-2-260. Section 61-14-710. (A) A manufacturer of hemp beverages or a person who imports these products produced outside the United States may not sell, barter, exchange, transfer, or deliver for resale hemp beverages unless the person holds a valid hemp beverage wholesaler's permit, and a holder of a hemp beverage wholesaler's permit may not sell, barter, exchange, transfer, or deliver for resale hemp beverages to a person who does not have a hemp manufacturer's license or hemp beverage retailer's license and an alcohol liquor store license. (B) Manufacturers of hemp beverages are subject to Sections 61-6-1100 and 61-6-1110 in the same manner and to the same extent as those provisions apply to manufacturers of alcoholic liquor. (C) Wholesalers of hemp beverages are subject to Article 3, Chapter 6, Title 61 in the same manner and to the same extent as those provisions apply to wholesalers of alcoholic liquor. (D) Retailers of hemp beverages must maintain an alcohol liquor store permit in order to sell hemp beverages. Retailers of hemp beverages are subject to Article 3, Chapter 6, Title 61 in the same manner and to the same extent as those provisions apply to alcoholic liquor. Section 61-14-720. (A) The biennial license taxes on licenses granted pursuant to this article in addition to all other license taxes, are as follows: (1) manufacturer's license: fifty thousand dollars; (2) wholesaler's license: twenty thousand dollars; (3) retail dealer's license: one thousand two hundred dollars. (B) Each applicant shall pay a filing fee of one hundred dollars, which must accompany the initial application for each location and is not refundable. (C) A person who applies for a license after the first day of a license period shall pay license fees in accordance with the schedule provided in Section 61-6-1810. Section 61-14-730. (A) Hemp beverage sales must be taxed at the same rate and in the same manner as alcoholic liquors pursuant to Article 3, Chapter 33, Title 12 except Section 12-33-245. (B) Wholesale of hemp beverages must be taxed at the same rate and in the same manner as Article 5, Chapter 33, Title 12. SECTION 5.  Article 3, Chapter 14, Title 61 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 61-14-370.    Local school districts shall collaborate with the State Department of Education, the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division, and the Attorney General's office, as appropriate, to implement a policy to educate and notify students of the provisions of this chapter which includes adequate notice to students, parents or guardians, the public, and school personnel of the change in law. SECTION 6.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 7. The prohibition and enforcement of hemp beverage distribution and sales to individuals under the age of twenty-one are effective upon signature of the Governor. The remaining provisions of this act are effective October 1, 2026. ----XX----